Utah, session 2026, HB44.
Section 1. Section 53-13-105 is amended to read:53-13-105Effective 05/06/26. Special function officer.(1)(a)"Special function officer" means a sworn and certified peace officer performing specialized investigations, service of legal process, security functions, or specialized ordinance, rule, or regulatory functions.(b)"Special function officer" includes:(i)state military police;(ii)constables;(iii)port-of-entry agents as defined in Section 72-1-102;(iv)authorized employees or agents of the Department of Transportation assigned to administer and enforce the provisions of Title 72, Chapter 9, Motor Carrier Safety Act;(v)school district security officers;(vi)Utah State Hospital security officers designated pursuant to Section 26B-5-303;(vii)Utah State Developmental Center security officers designated pursuant to Section 26B-6-506;(viii)fire arson investigators for any political subdivision of the state;(ix)ordinance enforcement officers employed by municipalities or counties may be special function officers;(x)employees of the Department of Natural Resources who have been designated to conduct supplemental enforcement functions as a collateral duty;(xi)railroad special agents deputized by a county sheriff under Section 17-76-202 or 17-76-303 or appointed under Section 56-1-21.5;(xii)auxiliary officers, as described by Section 53-13-112;(xiii)special agents, process servers, and investigators employed by city attorneys;(xiv)criminal tax investigators designated under Section 59-1-206; and(xv)all other persons designated by statute as having special function officer authority or limited peace officer authority.(2)(a)A special function officer may exercise that spectrum of peace officer authority that has been designated by statute to the employing agency, and only while on duty, and not for the purpose of general law enforcement.(b)If the special function officer is charged with security functions respecting facilities or property, the powers may be exercised only in connection with acts occurring on the property where the officer is employed or when required for the protection of the employer's interest, property, or employees.(c)A special function officer may carry firearms only while on duty, and only if authorized and under conditions specified by the officer's employer or chief administrator.(d)While on duty, a special function officer employed by an elected sheriff or by a law enforcement agency of the state or of a political subdivision may respond to situations observed by the special function officer, whether on or off the officer's assigned duty location, and is authorized to perform collateral duties for the purposes of public safety, pending arrival of law enforcement officers from a local law enforcement agency.(3)(a)A special function officer may not exercise the authority of a special function officer until:(i)the officer has satisfactorily completed an approved basic training program for special function officers as provided under Subsection (4); and(ii)the chief law enforcement officer or administrator has certified this fact to the director of the division.(b)City and county constables and their deputies shall certify their completion of training to the legislative governing body of the city or county they serve.(4)(a)The agency that the special function officer serves may establish and maintain a basic special function course and in-service training programs as approved by the director of the division with the advice and consent of the council.(b)The in-service training shall consist of no fewer than 40 hours per year and may be conducted by the agency's own staff or by other agencies.(5)(a)An individual shall be 19 years old or older before being certified or employed as a special function officer.(b)A special function officer who is under 21 years old may only work as a correctional officer in accordance with Section 53-13-104.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-22-103 is amended to read:53-22-103Effective 05/06/26. County sheriff responsibilities -- Coordination.(1)Each county sheriff shall identify an individual as a county security chief within the sheriff's office to coordinate security responsibilities, protocols, and required trainings between the state security chief, the county sheriff's office, and the corresponding police chiefs whose jurisdiction includes a public school within the county.(2)The county security chief shall:(a)in collaboration with the school safety and security specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6 and a member of the local law enforcement agency of relevant jurisdiction as described in Section 53-25-701:(i)administer or coordinate with a designee from the local law enforcement agency of relevant jurisdiction to participate in, by any appropriate means the county security chief determines, the school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5; and(ii)review the results of the school safety needs assessment to recommend and implement improvements to school facilities, policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security;(b)collaborate and maintain effective communications regarding school safety with each:(i)school safety and security specialist in the county security chief's county, as described in Section 53G-8-701.6;(ii)school safety and security director in the county security chief's county, as described in Section 53G-8-701.8; and(iii)local law enforcement agency within the county;(c)administer, or, if a local education agency chooses, designate qualified entities to administer, with the corresponding police chiefs whose jurisdiction includes a public school, the trainings described in Sections 53-22-105 and 53G-8-704, including:(i)assessing if an individual is capable of the duties and responsibilities that the trainings cover;(ii)denying an individual the ability to be any of the school safety personnel described in Section 53G-8-701.5 if the county security chief finds the individual is not capable of the duties and responsibilities that the trainings cover; and(iii)for any designated entity under this Subsection (2)(c):(A)ensuring the designated entity meets minimum training standards established by the state security chief;(B)providing written approval of the designation;(C)ensuring the designated entity coordinates with local law enforcement of the relevant jurisdiction; and(D)maintaining oversight and final authority over all training administration; and(c)administer with the corresponding police chiefs whose jurisdiction includes a public school, the trainings described in Sections 53-22-105 and 53G-8-704, including:(i)assessing if an individual is capable of the duties and responsibilities that the trainings cover; and(ii)denying an individual the ability to be a school safety personnel described in Section 53G-8-701.5 if the county security chief finds the individual is not capable of the duties and responsibilities that the trainings cover; and(d)in conjunction with the state security chief, administer the school guardian program established in Section 53-22-105 at any school participating in the program in the county security chief's county.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53-22-105 is amended to read:53-22-105Effective 05/06/26. School guardian program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Annual training" means an annual four-hour training that:(i)a county security chief or a designee administers in coordination with personnel from local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction as described in SectionSubsection 53-25-701(2)(b);(ii)the state security chief approves;(iii)can be tailored to local needs;(iv)allows an individual to practice and demonstrate firearms proficiency at a firearms range using the firearm the individual carries for self defense and defense of others;(v)includes the following components:(A)firearm safety, including safe storage of a firearm;(B)de-escalation tactics;(C)the role of mental health in incidents; and(D)disability awareness and interactions; and(vi)contains other training needs as determined by the state security chief.(b)"Biannual training" means a twice-yearly training that:(i)is at least four hours, unless otherwise approved by the state security chief;(ii)a county security chief or a designee administers in coordination with personnel from local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction as described in SectionSubsection 53-25-701(2)(b);(iii)the state security chief approves;(iv)can be tailored to local needs;(v)through which a school guardian at a school or simulated school environment:(A)receives training on the specifics of the building or buildings of the school, including the location of emergency supplies and security infrastructure; and(B)participates in a live-action practice plan with school administrators in responding to active threats at the school; and(vi)shall be taken with at least three months in between the two trainings.(c)"Deadly force" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-2-408.(c)(d)"Firearm" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-11-101.(d)(e)"Initial training" means an in-person training that:(i)a county security chief or a designee administers in coordination with personnel from local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction as described in SectionSubsection 53-25-701(2)(b);(ii)the state security chief approves;(iii)can be tailored to local needs; and(iv)provides:(A)training on general familiarity with the types of firearms that can be concealed for self-defense and defense of others;(B)training on the safe loading, unloading, storage, and carrying of firearms in a school setting;(C)training at a firearms range with instruction regarding firearms fundamentals, marksmanship, the demonstration and explanation of the difference between sight picture, sight alignment, and trigger control, and a recognized pistol course;(D)current laws dealing with the lawful use of a firearm by a private citizen, including laws on self-defense, defense of others, transportation of firearms, and concealment of firearms;(E)coordination with law enforcement officers in the event of an active threat;(F)basic trauma first aid;(G)the appropriate use of force, emphasizing the de-escalation of force and alternatives to using force; and(H)situational response evaluations, including:(I)protecting and securing a crime or accident scene;(II)notifying law enforcement;(III)controlling information; and(IV)other training that the county sheriff, designee, or department deems appropriate.(e)(f)"Program" means the school guardian program created in this section.(f)(g)(i)"School employee" means an employee of a school or law enforcement agency whose duties and responsibilities require the employee to be physically present at a school's campus while school is in session.(ii)"School employee" does not include a principal, teacher, or individual whose primary responsibilities require the employee to be primarily present in a classroom to teach, care for, or interact with students, unless:(A)the principal, teacher, or individual is employed at a school with 350 or fewer students;(B)the principal, teacher, or individual is employed at a school with adjacent campuses as determined by the state security chief; or(C)as provided in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(3).(g)(h)"School guardian" means a school employee who meets the requirements of Subsection (3).(2)(a)(i)There is created within the department the school guardian program.(ii)The state security chief shall oversee the school guardian program.(iii)The applicable county security chief shall administer the school guardian program in each county.(b)The state security chief shall ensure that the school guardian program includes:(i)initial training;(ii)biannual training; and(iii)annual training.(c)A county sheriff may partner or contract with:(i)another county sheriff to support the respective county security chiefs in jointly administering the school guardian program in the relevant counties; and(ii)a local law enforcement agency of relevant jurisdiction to provide the:(A)initial training;(B)biannual training; and(C)annual training.(3)(a)A school employee that volunteers to participate is eligible to join the program as a school guardian if:(i)the school administrator approves the volunteer school employee to be designated as a school guardian;(ii)the school employee satisfactorily completes initial training within six months before the day on which the school employee joins the program;(iii)the school employee holds a valid concealed carry permit issued under Chapter 5a, Part 3, Concealed Firearm Permits;(iv)the school employee certifies to the sheriff of the county where the school is located that the school employee has undergone the training in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(ii) and intends to serve as a school guardian; and(v)the school employee:(A)completes an initial "fit to carry" assessment the Department of Health and Human Services approves and a provider administers; and(B)maintains compliance with mental health screening requirements consistent with law enforcement standards.(b)After joining the program a school guardian shall complete annual training and biannual training to retain the designation of a school guardian in the program.(4)The state security chief shall:(a)for each school that participates in the program, track each school guardian at the school by collecting the photograph and the name and contact information for each guardian;(b)make the information described in Subsection (4)(a) readily available to each law enforcement agency in the state categorized by school; and(c)provide each school guardian with a one-time stipend of $500.in accordance with Section 53G-8-701.5, and subject to legislative appropriations, consult with the State Board of Education to provide each school guardian with a one-time stipend.(5)A school guardian:(a)may store the school guardian's firearm on the grounds of a school only if:(i)the firearm is stored in a biometric gun safe;(ii)the biometric gun safe is located in the school guardian's office; and(iii)the school guardian is physically present on the grounds of the school while the firearm is stored in the safe;(b)shall carry the school guardian's firearm in a concealed manner; and(c)may not, unless during an active threat, display or open carry a firearm while on school grounds.(a)shall carry the school guardian's firearm on the school guardian's person in a concealed manner at all times while on duty during school hours;(b)may temporarily store the school guardian's firearm in a biometric gun safe located in the school guardian's office only:(i)for brief personal needs such as restroom use;(ii)during required activities where carrying is physically impractical and approved by the school administrator; or(iii)at the end of the school guardian's shift;(c)shall ensure that any temporary storage under Subsection (5)(b):(i)does not exceed 15 minutes per occasion, except as approved by the school administrator for documented necessity;(ii)occurs only when the school guardian is physically present on school grounds; and(iii)is immediately retrievable by the school guardian;(d)may not, unless during an active threat, display or open carry a firearm while on school grounds; and(e)shall ensure the firearm is immediately accessible to respond to active threats during the school guardian's assigned duty hours.(6)Except as provided in Subsection (5)(c)(5)(d), this section does not prohibit an individual who has a valid concealed carry permit but is not participating in the program from carrying a firearm on the grounds of a public school or charter school under Subsection 76-11-205(4).(7)A school guardian:(a)does not have authority to act in a law enforcement capacity; and(b)may, at the school where the school guardian is employed:(i)take actions necessary to prevent or abate an active threat; and(ii)temporarily detain an individual when the school guardian has reasonable cause to believe the individual has committed or is about to commit a forcible felony, as that term is defined in Section 76-2-402.(8)A school may designate a single volunteer or multiple volunteers to participate in the school guardian program to satisfy the school safety personnel requirements of Section 53G-8-701.5.(9)The department may adopt, according to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, rules to administer this section.(10)A school guardian who has active status in the guardian program is not liable for any civil damages or penalties if the school guardian:(a)when carrying or storing a firearm:(i)is acting in good faith; and(ii)is not grossly negligent; or(b)threatens, draws, or otherwise uses a firearm reasonably believing the action to benecessary in compliance with Section 76-2-402.(11)A school guardian shall file a report described in Subsection (12) if, during the performance of the school guardian's duties, the school guardian points a firearm at an individual.(12)(a)A report described in Subsection (11) shall include:(i)a description of the incident;(ii)the identification of the individuals involved in the incident; and(iii)any other information required by the state security chief.(b)A school guardian shall submit a report required under Subsection (11) to the school administrator, school safety and security director, and the state security chief within 48 hours after the incident.(c)The school administrator, school safety and security director, and the state security chief shall consult and review the report submitted under Subsection (12)(b).(13)The requirements of Subsections (11) and (12) do not apply to a training exercise.(14)If a school guardian uses deadly force, the guardian:(a)shall be placed on administrative leave pending investigation;(b)may not be required to provide a written report described in Subsections (11) and (12);(c)(i)may not be required to participate in a voluntary interview; and(ii)if the guardian chooses to participate in an interview, the interview may not be sooner than two sleep cycles after the incident; and(d)shall be subject to investigation by the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction over the school's location.(14)(15)A school guardian may have the designation of school guardian revoked at any time by the school principal, county sheriff, or state security chief.(15)(16)(a)Any information or record created detailing a school guardian's participation in the program is:(i)a private, controlled, or protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(ii)available only to:(A)the state security chief;(B)administrators at the school guardian's school;(C)if applicable, other school safety personnel described in Section 53G-8-701.5;(D)school employees participating in the Educator-Protector Program under Section 53-22-107 at the same school;(D)(E)a local law enforcement agency that would respond to the school in case of an emergency; and(E)(F)the individual designated by the county sheriff in accordance with Section 53-22-103 of the county of the school where the school guardian in the program is located.(b)The information or record described in Subsection (15)(a)(16)(a) includes information related to the school guardian's identity and activity within the program as described in this section and any personal identifying information of a school guardian participating in the program collected or obtained during initial training, annual training, and biannual training.(c)An individual who intentionally or knowingly provides the information described in Subsection (15)(a)(16)(a) to an individual or entity not listed in Subsection (15)(a)(ii)(16)(a)(ii) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53-22-107 is amended to read:53-22-107Effective 05/06/26. Educator-Protector Program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Annual classroom response training" means a training for a teacherschool employee:(i)that is held at least once a year and is administered, at no cost to a teacherschool employee, by the individual identified by the county sheriff as described in Section 53-22-103; and(ii)where the teacherschool employee is trained:(A)on how to defend a classroom against active threats emphasizing the teacher'sschool employee's role in stationary defense; and(B)on the safe loading, unloading, storage, and carrying of firearms in a school setting.(b)"Bureau" means the Bureau of Criminal Identification created in Section 53-10-201.(c)"Local education agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53E-1-102.(d)"Program" means the Educator-Protector Program created under this section.(e)"Teacher" means an individual employed by a local education agency who has an assignment to teach in a classroom."School employee" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-105.(2)There is created the Educator-Protector Program to incentivize a teacherschool employee to responsibly secure or carry a firearm on the grounds of the school where the teacherschool employee is employed.(3)(a)To participate in the program, a teacherschool employee shall:(i)have completed an annual classroom response training within six months before the day on which the teacherschool employee joins the program;(ii)have a valid concealed carry permit issued under Title 53, Chapter 5a, Part 3, Concealed Firearm Permits; and(iii)certify to the department that:(A)the teacherschool employee satisfies the requirements described in Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii); and(B)if applicable, intends to securely store or carry a firearm on the grounds of a school where the teacherschool employee is employed.(b)After joining the program, to retain the teacher'sschool employee's active status in the program, a teacherschool employee shall:(i)participate in annual classroom response training; and(ii)comply with any rules established by the department in accordance with Subsection (10).(4)(a)The state security chief shall:(i)track each teacherschool employee that participates in the program by collecting a photograph, name, and contact information for each teacherschool employee;(ii)make the information described in Subsection (4)(a)(4)(a)(i) readily available to each law enforcement agency in the state; and(iii)provide reasonable reimbursement, using funds appropriated by the Legislature, to a county sheriff for providing a teacherschool employee with annual classroom response training.(b)The state security chief shall categorize the information described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) by school.(5)A teacherschool employee participating in the program:(a)may store the teacher'sschool employee's firearm on the grounds of a school only if:(i)the firearm is stored in a biometric gun safe;(ii)the biometric gun safe is located in the teacher'sschool employee's classroom or office; and(iii)the teacherschool employee is physically present on the grounds of the school while the firearm is stored in the biometric gun safe; and(b)shall carry the teacher'sschool employee's firearm in a concealed manner unless during an active threat.(6)This section does not prohibit an individual who has a valid concealed carry permit but is not participating in the program from carrying firearms on the grounds of a school as described in Subsection 76-11-205(4).(7)(a)A teacherschool employee who has active status in the program is not liable for any civil damages or penalties if the teacherschool employee:(i)when carrying or storing a firearm:(A)is acting in good faith; and(B)is not grossly negligent; or(ii)threatens, draws, or otherwise uses a firearm reasonably believing the action to be necessary in compliance with Section 76-2-402.(b)A local education agency is not liable for civil damages or penalties resulting from a teacherschool employee who is participating in the program carrying, using, or storing a firearm at a school.(8)A local education agency may not prevent a teacherschool employee from participating in the program under this section.(9)(a)Any information or record created detailing a teacher'sschool employee's participation in the program is:(i)a private, controlled, or protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(ii)available only to:(A)the state security chief;(B)school guardians under Section 53-22-105 at the same school;(B)(C)a local law enforcement agency that would respond to the school in case of an emergency; and(C)(D)the individual identified by the county sheriff as described in Section 53-22-103.(b)The information or record described in Subsection (9)(a) includes the information described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) and any personal identifying information of a teacherschool employee participating in the program collected or obtained during annual classroom response training.(c)An individual who intentionally or knowingly provides the information described in Subsection (9)(a) to an individual or entity not listed in Subsection (9)(a)(ii) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(10)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may adopt rules to administer this section.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53-25-701 is amended to read:53-25-701Effective 05/06/26. Requirements for school safety.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Local law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction over a school's physical location.(b) "School safety needs assessment" means the assessment required under Section 53G-8-701.5.(c)"Security camera system" means the system described in Section 53G-8-805.(2)Each local law enforcement agency shall:(a)as coordinated with the county security chief described in Section 53-22-103, allocate adequate personnel to participate in the school safety needs assessments with a school's school safety and security specialist as required by Section 53G-8-701.5 for each school within the local law enforcement's jurisdiction;(b)if aany school located within the county of a local law enforcement agency's jurisdiction elects to satisfy the requirements described in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(2)(a)(ii) by employing school guardians, assign adequate personnel time as the county security chief determines to assist the county security chief in administering the trainings required under Section 53-22-105;(c)ensure the school safety and security specialist for each school has all relevant information collected by the county security chief or the local law enforcement agency to submit the completed assessments to the School Safety Center created in Section 53G-8-802 by October 15 of each year;(d)coordinate with each school within the local law enforcement's jurisdiction to obtain and maintain access to school security camera systems as described in Section 53G-8-805; and(e)coordinate with the relevant county security chiefs as specified in Sections 53-22-103 and 53-22-105.(3)The county security chief shall consider the number of schools in a law enforcement agency's direct jurisdiction that have elected to satisfy the requirements described in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(2)(a)(ii) by employing school guardians when determining the adequate personnel time described in Subsection (2)(b) a law enforcement agency shall assign to assist the county security chief in administering the trainings required under Section 53-22-105.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53G-6-806 is amended to read:53G-6-806Effective 05/06/26. Parent portal. (1)As used in this section:(a)"Parent portal" means the posting the state board is required to provide under this section.(b)"School" means a public elementary or secondary school, including a charter school.(2)(a)The state board shall post information that allows a parent of a student enrolled in a school to:(i)access an LEA's policies required by Sections 53G-9-203 and 53G-9-605;(ii)be informed of resources and steps to follow when a student has been the subject, perpetrator, or bystander of bullying, cyber-bullying, hazing, retaliation, or abusive conduct such as:(A)resources for the student, including short-term mental health services;(B)options for the student to make changes to the student's educational environment;(C)options for alternative school enrollment;(D)options for differentiated start or stop times;(E)options for differentiated exit and entrance locations; and(F)the designated employee for an LEA who addresses incidents of bullying, cyber-bullying, hazing, retaliation, and abusive conduct;(iii)be informed of the steps and resources for filing a grievance with a school or LEA regarding bullying, cyber-bullying, hazing, or retaliation;(iv)be informed of the steps and resources for seeking accommodations under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq;(v)be informed of the steps and resources for seeking accommodations under state or federal law regarding religious accommodations;(vi)be informed of the steps and resources for filing a grievance for an alleged violation of state or federal law, including:(A)Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d-2000d-4;(B)Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681-1688;(C)Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 794; and(D)Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12131-12165;(vii)receive information about constitutional rights and freedoms afforded to families in public education;(viii)be informed of how to access an internal audit hotline if established by the state board; and(ix)be informed of services for military families.(b)In addition to the information required under Subsection (2)(a), the state board:(i)shall include in the parent portal:(A)the comparison tool created under Section 53G-6-805; (B)beginning July 1, 2028, school level safety data, including data points described in Section 53E-3-516; and(C)a link to the public safety portal described in Section 63A-16-1002; and(ii)may include in the parent portal other information that the state board determines is helpful to parents.(3)(a)The state board shall post the parent portal at a location that is easily located by a parent.(b)The state board shall update the parent portal at least annually.(c)In accordance with state and federal law, the state board may collaborate with a third-party to provide safety data visualization in comparison to other states' data.(4)An LEA shall annually notify each of the following of how to access the parent portal:(a)a parent of a student; and(b)a teacher, principal, or other professional staff within the LEA.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 53G-7-227 is amended to read:53G-7-227Effective 05/06/26. Device prohibition.(1)As used in this section:(a)(i)"AI glasses" means wearable eyewear, whether prescription or non-prescription, that:(A)incorporates one or more sensors, including cameras, microphones, accelerometers, gyroscopes, or biometric sensors;(B)uses artificial intelligence, machine learning algorithms, or neural networks to process, analyze, or interpret data captured by the sensors in real-time or near real-time;(C)provides information, overlays, translations, identification, or other augmented content to the wearer through visual displays, audio output, or haptic feedback; and(D)may transmit, store, or share data to external devices, networks, or cloud-based services.(ii)"AI glasses" does not include:(A)prescription eyeglasses or sunglasses without electronic components;(B)wearable devices used solely for reading glasses or vision correction without data collection or processing capabilities;(C)protective eyewear that contains only passive sensors without artificial intelligence processing capabilities; or(D)virtual reality headsets designed primarily for immersive gaming or entertainment that are not suitable for continuous wear in public settings.(a)(b)"Cellphone" means a handheld, portable electronic device that is designed to be operated using one or both hands and is capable of transmitting and receiving voice, data, or text communication by means of:(i)a cellular network;(ii)a satellite network; or(iii)any other wireless technology.(b)(c)"Cellphone" includes:(i)a smartphone;(ii)a feature phone;(iii)a mobile phone;(iv)a satellite phone; or(v)a personal digital assistant that incorporates capabilities similar to a smartphone, feature phone, mobile phone, or satellite phone.(c)(d)"Classroom hours" means:(i)time during which a student receives scheduled, teacher-supervised instruction that occurs:(A)in a physical or virtual classroom setting;(B)during regular school operating hours; and(C)as part of an approved educational curriculum.(ii)"Classroom hours" does not include:(A)lunch periods;(B)recess;(C)transit time between classes;(D)study halls unless directly supervised by a qualified instructor;(E)after-school activities unless part of an approved extended learning program; or(F)independent study time occurring outside scheduled instruction.(d)(e)(i)"Emerging technology" means any other device that has or will be able to act in place of or as an extension of an individual's cellphone.(ii)"Emerging technology" does not include school provided or required devices.(e)(f)"Smart watch" means a wearable computing device that closely resembles a wristwatch or other time-keeping device with the capacity to act in place of or as an extension of an individual's cellphone.(f)(g)"Smart watch" does not include a wearable device that can only:(i)tell time;(ii)monitor an individual's health informatics;(iii)receive and display notifications or information without the capability to respond; or(iv)track the individual's physical location.(2)(a)An LEA:(i)shall establish a policy that allows a student to use a cellphone, smart watch, AI glasses, or emerging technology:(A)to respond to an imminent threat to the health or safety of an individual;(B)to respond to a school-wide emergency;(C)to use the SafeUT Crisis Line described in Section 53H-4-210;(D)for a student's IEP or Section 504 accommodation plan; or(E)to address a medical necessity; and(ii)may establish a policy that provides for other circumstances when a student may use a cellphone, smart watch, AI glasses, or emerging technology.(b)An LEA may establish policies that:(i)extend restrictions on student use of cellphones, smart watches, or emerging technologies to non-classroom hours during the school day, including:(A)lunch periods;(B)transition times between classes; and(C)other school-supervised activities; and(ii)impose additional limitations on the use of cellphones, smart watches, or emerging technologies beyond those required by this section.(3)Except as provided in Subsection (2), a student may not use a cellphone, smart watch, AI glasses, or emerging technology at a school during classroom hours.(4)The state board may create one or more model policies regarding when a student may use a student's cellphone, smart watch, AI glasses, or emerging technology in a school during classroom hours consistent with this section.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 53G-8-101 is amended to read:53G-8-101Effective 05/06/26. General provisions.This chapter is known as "Discipline and Safety."Reserved.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 53G-8-102 is amended to read:53G-8-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions for chapter.As used in this chapter:(1)"Climate" means the perceptions and experiences of students, staff, parents, and the community regarding the school's environment and the resources that support the experiences.(2)"Culture" means the beliefs, values, and practices that shape how a school functions and influences student learning and well-being through policies, procedures, and safety protocols.(3)"Forcible felony" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-2-402.(4)"K-12 School Campus" means an LEA governed property or building where K-12 students gather daily for instructional purposes and has an assigned administrator.(5)"Physical Space" means the way in which a building is designed and structured to promote safety including the minimum safety and security standards as described in Section 53-22-102.(6)"School safety" means the physical space, culture, and climate of a school.(7)"School safety personnel" means the personnel described in Section 53G-8-701.5.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 53G-8-301 is amended to read:53G-8-301Effective 05/06/26. Emergency safety interventions -- Appropriate uses -- Penalties.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Corporal punishment" means the intentional infliction of physical pain upon the body of a student as a disciplinary measure.(b)"Emergency safety intervention" means the use of seclusion or physical restraint when a student presents an immediate danger to self or others.(c)"Physical escort" means a temporary touching or holding of the hand, wrist, arm, shoulder, or back for the purpose of guiding a student to another location.(d)"Physical restraint" means a personal restriction that immobilizes or significantly reduces the ability of a student to move the student's arms, legs, body, or head freely.(e)"School" means a public or private elementary school, secondary school, or preschool.(f)"Seclusion" means seclusionary time out that is the involuntary confinement of a student alone in a room or area from which the student is physically prevented from leaving, including:(i)placing a student in a locked room; or(ii)placing a student in a room where the door is blocked by furniture or held closed by staff.(g)"Student" means an individual who is:(i)under the age of 1919 years old and receiving educational services; or(ii)under the age of 2323 years old and receiving educational services as an individual with a disability.(2)(a)A school employee shall first use the least restrictive intervention available to the school employee, including a physical escort, to address circumstances described in Subsection (4).(b)Nothing in this section prohibits a school employee from subsequently using less restrictive interventions to address circumstances described in Subsection (4).(3)(a)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board shall make rules to:(i)establish guidelines and best practices that consider individual student needs related to emergency safety interventions described in Subsection (10)(b);(ii)establish intervention reporting requirements;(iii)create school staff training standards that may be included in an existing training;(iv)develop parental notification procedures;(v)implement data collection and review processes;(vi)establish investigation protocols;(vii)establish data collection and reporting requirements for an LEA regarding:(A)incidents of seclusion;(B)alternative interventions used;(C)student demographic information, including sex, gender, age, grade in school, and applicable disability status; and(D)incident outcomes.(b)The state board shall include the information described in Subsection (3)(a) in the State Superintendent's Annual Report described in Section 53E-1-203.(4)A school employee may use reasonable and necessary physical restraint only:(a)in self defense;(b)to obtain possession of a weapon or other dangerous object in the possession or under the control of a student;(c)to protect a student or another individual from physical injury;(d)to remove from a situation a student who is violent; or(e)to protect property from being damaged, when physical safety is at risk.(5)(a)A school employee may not inflict or cause the infliction of corporal punishment upon a student.(b)The reporting and investigation requirements of Title 80, Chapter 2, Part 6, Child Abuse and Neglect Reports, apply to complaints on corporal punishment.(c)Evidence of corporal punishment that would qualify as reasonable discipline under Section 76-2-401 is insufficient to establish liability in a civil or criminal action.(d)Subject to the Rules of Evidence, evidence of corporal punishment that exceeds reasonable discipline under Section 76-2-401 may be used by a court to establish civil or criminal liability.(6)School authorities shall take prompt and appropriate action, including in-service training and other administrative action, upon confirming a violation of this section.(7)The Division of Child and Family Services shall maintain all violation reports made in accordance with this section under the confidentiality requirements of Section 80-2-1005.(8)A school or individual who makes a good faith report or cooperates in an investigation shall receive immunity from civil or criminal liability.(9)A court with jurisdiction under Title 78A, Judiciary and Judicial Administration, may take appropriate action against any employing entity if the court finds that the employing entity has not taken reasonable steps to enforce the provisions of this part.(10)A school: (a)may not:(i)enforce any rule, policy, or directive that permits acts prohibited by this section;(ii)sanction an employee who refuses to commit a prohibited act; or(iii)except as provided in Subsection (10)(b), use seclusion:(A)as an intervention or disciplinary practice;(B)for coercion, retaliation, or humiliation; or(C)due to inadequate staffing or for the staff member's convenience;(b)for a student in grade 1 or higher, may use seclusion as an emergency safety intervention only when:(i)the LEA has developed and implemented written policies and procedures that:(A)describe the circumstances under which a staff member may use seclusion;(B)describe which staff members are authorized to use seclusion;(C)describe procedures for monitoring a student that is in seclusion;(D)describe time limitations on the use of seclusion;(E)require immediate and continuous review of the decision to use seclusion;(F)require documenting the use of seclusion;(G)describe record keeping requirements for records related to the use of seclusion; and(H)require debriefing of all witnesses, involved staff members, the student who was secluded, and the parent of the student who was secluded;(ii)a student poses an immediate and significant threat to the student or others;(iii)less restrictive interventions have failed;(iv)a staff member who is familiar to the student is actively supervising the student for the duration of the seclusion; and(v)the use is time-limited to a maximum time of 30 minutes and monitored;(c)if seclusion was used, shall document the reason for its use, duration, and any alternative strategies attempted; and(d)shall notify parents immediately, and not to exceed 15 minutes after the use, of any emergency safety intervention used on the parent's child, including seclusion or physical restraint.(11)An LEA shall collect and report data to the state board annually regarding:(a)an incident; and(b)for each incident, the:(i)duration of an intervention used to respond to the incident;(ii)stated purpose for any intervention used;(iii)alternative interventions attempted;(iv)student demographic information, including sex, gender, age, grade in school, and applicable disability status; and(v)relevant training offered to staff and if the staff involved received the relevant training without revealing the identity of the staff member.(12)This section does not apply to:(a)a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 53-13-103;(b)a parochial or private school that:(i)does not receive state funds;(ii)adopts a policy of exemption from this section; and(iii)notifies the parents of students in the school of the exemption; or(c)behavior support intervention which is in compliance with:(i)Section 76-2-401; and(ii)state and local rules adopted under Section 53E-7-204.(13)Any violations of this section, including violations of any standards for seclusion or physical restraint established by the state board pursuant to this section, shall:(a)constitute an act of unlawful detention and is subject to the penalty described in Section 76-5-304; and(b)result in a referral to:(i)local law enforcement; and(ii)the Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission established in Section 53E-6-501.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 53G-8-701 is amended to read:53G-8-701Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Armed school security guard" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-8-704.(2)"County security chief" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-101.(3)"Law enforcement agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-1-102.(4)"Public school" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1.(5)"School guardian" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-10653-22-105.(6)"School is in session" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53E-3-516.(7)"School resource officer" means a law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103, who contracts with or whose law enforcement agency contracts with an LEA to provide law enforcement services for the LEA.(8)"School safety and security director" means an individual whom an LEA designates in accordance with Section 53G-8-701.8.(9)"School safety and security specialist" means a school employee designated under Section 53G-8-701.6 who is responsible for supporting school safety initiatives.(10)"School Safety Center" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-8-801.(11)"State security chief" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-101.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 53G-8-701.5 is amended to read:53G-8-701.5Effective 05/06/26. School safety needs assessment -- School safety personnel -- Alternative requirements.(1)(a)In accordance with Subsections (1)(c) through (e), no later than October 15 of an applicable year, an LEA shall:(i)ensure a school safety needs assessment the state security chief selects in collaboration with the school safety center is conducted in accordance with Subsection (1)(b) for each school or K-12 campus within the LEA to determine the needs and deficiencies regarding:(A)appropriate school safety personnel, including necessary supports, training, and policy creation for the personnel;(B)physical building security and safety, including required upgrades to facilities and safety technology;(C)a school's current threat and emergency response protocols, including any emergency response agreements with local law enforcement; (D)if applicable, a school's current visitor management protocols, including alignment with recommended best practices as described in Section 53G-8-806;(D)(E)cardiac emergency preparedness, including an inventory of whether automated external defibrillators are present and accessible, maintenance status, and current staff training offerings; and(E)(F)compliance with universal access key box requirements under Section 53G-8-805; and(ii)report the results of the school safety needs assessment for each school within the LEA to the state security chief and the School Safety Center.(b)(i)The school safety specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6, in collaboration with the county security chief, and with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction over the school as described in Section 53-25-701, shall conduct the school safety needs assessment for each school.(ii)A school safety and security director may fulfill the role of a school safety and security specialist in conducting the school safety needs assessment.(c)The school safety needs assessment required under Subsection (1)(a)(i) shall be conducted at least once every three years for each school or K-12 campus.(d)An LEA may implement a rotating or staggered schedule for conducting school safety needs assessments among the buildings within the LEA, provided that:(i) each school within a K-12 campus is assessed at least once every three years; and(ii)the LEA documents the rotating or staggered assessment schedule and shares this schedule with the state security chief, the School Safety Center, the county security chief, and the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction as described in Section 53-25-701.(e)The LEA shall update the assessment schedule as necessary to ensure compliance with the three-year assessment requirement under Subsection (1)(c).(f)The state board shall use the results of the school safety needs assessment for each school within an LEA to award a grant to an LEA in accordance with Section 53F-5-220.(g)Any information or record detailing a school's needs assessment results is:(i)a private, controlled, or protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(ii)available only to:(A)the state security chief;(B)the School Safety Center;(C)members of an LEA governing board;(D)administrators of the LEA and school the needs assessment concerns;(E)only to the extent necessary to award a grant under Section 53F-5-220, the state board;(F)the applicable school safety personnel described in Subsection (2);(G)a local law enforcement agency that would respond to the school in case of an emergency; and(H)the county security chief.(h)An individual who intentionally or knowingly provides the information described in Subsection (1)(g) to an individual or entity not listed in Subsection (1)(g)(ii) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.(2)(a)An LEA shall ensure each school within the LEA has the following school safety personnel:(i)a school safety and security specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6; and(ii)based on the results of the needs assessment described in Subsection (1), at least one of the following:(A)a school resource officer;(B)a school guardian; or(C)an armed school security guard.(b)In addition to the school safety personnel described in Subsection (2)(a), an LEA shall designate a school safety and security director described in Section 53G-8-701.8.(c)The same individual may serve in more than one of the roles listed in Subsections (2)(a) and (b) if the school notifies the School Safety Center and the state security chief of the decision to have the same individual serve in multiple roles as described in this Subsection (2).(d)An LEA that designates a school guardian under Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(B) shall ensure that:(i)the school guardian carries the firearm on the guardian's person during assigned duty hours as required in Section 53-22-105; and(ii)the LEA does not adopt policies that require or encourage school guardians to store firearms in a manner that prevents immediate access during school hours.(d)(e)An LEA may implement the requirements of Subsection (2)(a)(ii) before the LEA has completed the school safety needs assessment described in Subsection (1).(e)(f)The state security chief in consultation with the School Safety Center shall establish a timeline for an LEA to comply with the school safety personnel requirements of this Subsection (2).(3)(a)An LEA, school administrator, or private school may apply to the state security chief for an approved alternative to the requirements described in:(i)Section 53-22-105;(ii)this section;(iii)Section 53G-8-701.6;(iv)Section 53G-8-701.8; and(v)Section 53G-8-704.(b)In approving or denying an application described in Subsection (3)(a), the state security chief may consider factors that impact a school or LEA's ability to adhere to the requirements of this section, including the school or LEA's:(i)population size;(ii)staffing needs or capacity;(iii)geographic location;(iv)available funding; or(v)general demonstration of need for an alternative to the requirements of this section.(4)A private school shall identify an individual at the private school to serve as the safety liaison with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction and the state security chief.(5)(a)Notwithstanding Subsections (5)(b) and (c), an LEA may:(i)pay guardian stipends using local funds when state funding is exhausted; or(ii)supplement state funding with local funds.(b)In accordance with Subsection (5)(c), the state board shall be responsible for administering guardian stipend funding in coordination with the state security chief.(c)(i)The state security chief shall:(A)verify that a school guardian has met all requirements to be eligible for a stipend; and(B)certify each eligible school guardian to the state board through completion of required training and active status in the program.(ii)Upon certification by the state security chief, and subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall provide each eligible school guardian with a one-time stipend.(iii)The state board shall determine the amount of the stipend for each fiscal year based on:(A)the amount appropriated by the Legislature for school guardian stipends;(B)the projected number of school guardians statewide based on historical data and current program enrollment trends;(C)a reserve allocation of up to 10% of the total appropriation to account for school guardians who join the program after the beginning of the school year; and(D)any other factors the state board determines necessary to ensure equal distribution of the funds.(iv)All school guardians certified as eligible during the same fiscal year shall receive the same stipend amount, regardless of:(A)when during the fiscal year the school guardian completed training and became eligible; or(B)the size, location, or type of school where the guardian serves.(v)The state board shall:(A)announce the stipend amount for each fiscal year no later than August 1, or within 30 days of legislative appropriations if appropriated after July 1;(B)distribute stipends within 60 days of certification by the state security chief;(C)maintain a reserve for school guardians who become eligible later in the fiscal year;(D)if funds remain unallocated at the end of the fiscal year due to fewer school guardians than projected, carry forward the remaining funds to supplement the next fiscal year's stipend amount; and(E)if eligible school guardians exceed projections and available funding, pro-rate the stipend amount equally among all eligible school guardians for that fiscal year and report the shortfall to the Legislature.(vi)A school guardian is eligible to receive only one stipend regardless of:(A)serving at multiple schools; or(B)leaving and rejoining the program within the same fiscal year.(vii)If a school guardian leaves the program for any reason after receiving a stipend, the school guardian is not required to return the stipend unless the state security chief determines the school guardian:(A)obtained the stipend through fraud or misrepresentation; or(B) failed to actually meet the eligibility requirements under Section 53-22-105.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 53G-8-701.6 is amended to read:53G-8-701.6Effective 05/06/26. School safety and security specialist.(1)As used in this section,: (a)"principal""Principal" means the chief administrator at a public school, including:(a)(i)a school principal;(b)(ii)a charter school director; or(c)(iii)the superintendent of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(b)"Teacher" means an individual employed by a local education agency who has an assignment to teach in a classroom.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b) and except as provided in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(3), every campus within an LEA shall designate a school safety and security specialist from the employees of the relevant campus.(b)The school safety and security specialist:(i)may not be a principal or a teacher; and(ii)may be the school safety and security director at one campus within the LEA.(3)The school safety and security specialist shall:(a)report directly to the principal;(b)oversee school safety and security practices to ensure a safe and secure school environment for students and staff;(c)ensure adherence with all policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security through collaborating and maintaining effective communications with the following as applicable:(i)the principal;(ii)school staff;(iii)the school resource officer;(iv)the armed school security guard;(v)the school guardian;(vi)local law enforcement;(vii)the county security chief;(viii)the school safety and security director;(ix)the LEA; and(x)school-based behavioral and mental health professionals;(d)in collaboration with the county security chief and with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction over the school as described in Section 53-25-701:(i)conduct the school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5; (ii)in accordance with Sections 53-25-701 and 53G-8-701.5, submit the completed assessments to the School Safety Center created in Section 53G-8-802 by October 15 of each year; and(iii)review the results of the school safety needs assessment to recommend and implement improvements to school facilities, policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security;(e)participate on the multidisciplinary team that the school establishes;(f)conduct a behavioral threat assessment when the school safety and security specialist deems necessary using an evidence-based tool the state security chief recommends in consultation with the school safety centerSchool Safety Center and the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health;(g)regularly monitor and report to the principal, local law enforcement, and, if applicable, the LEA superintendent or designee, security risks for the school resulting from:(i)issues with school facilities; or(ii)the implementation of practices, policies, procedures, and protocols relating to school safety and security;(h)coordinate with local first responder agencies to implement and monitor safety and security drills in accordance with policy and applicable procedures and protocols;(i)ensure that school staff, and, when appropriate, students, receive training on and remain current on the school's safety and security procedures and protocols;(j)following an event where security of the school has been significantly compromised, organize a debriefing with the individuals listed in Subsection (3)(c) following the recommendations from the state security chief, in collaboration with the School Safety Center, regarding strengthening school safety and security practices, policies, procedures, and protocols;(k)abide by any LEA, school, or law enforcement agency policy outlining the chain of command;(l)during an emergency, coordinate with the following individuals as applicable, the:(i)school resource officer;(ii)school guardians;(iii)armed school security guards;(iv)school administrators; and(v)responding law enforcement officers;(m)follow any LEA, school, or law enforcement agency student privacy policies, including state and federal privacy laws;(n)participate in an annual training the state security chief selects in consultation with the School Safety Center; and(o)remain current on:(i)a comprehensive school guideline the state security chief selects;(ii)the duties of a school safety and security specialist described in this Subsection (3); and(iii)the school's emergency response plan.(4)During an active emergency at the school, the school safety and security specialist is subordinate to any responding law enforcement officers.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 53G-8-704 is amended to read:53G-8-704Effective 05/06/26. Contracts between an LEA and a contract security company for armed school security guards.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Armed private security officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-63-102.(b)"Armed school security guard" means: (i)an armed private security officer who:(i)(A)is licensed as an armed private security officer under Title 58, Chapter 63, Security Personnel Licensing Act; and(ii)(B)has met the requirements described in Subsection (4)(a).; or(ii)a special function officer.(c)"Contract security company" means: (i)for an armed private security officer, the same as that term is defined in Section 58-63-102.; and(ii)for a special function officer, the special function officer's employing law enforcement agency.(d)"Deadly force" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-2-408.(e)"Special function officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-13-105.(d)(f)"State security chief" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-102.(2)(a)An LEA may use an armed school security guard to satisfy the school safety personnel requirements of Section 53G-8-701.5.(b)An LEA that uses an armed school security guard under Subsection (2)(a) shall have a contract with a contract security company or if a special function officer is used as an armed school security guard, a contract with the law enforcement agency employing the special function officer, in accordance with Section 53G-8-703, to provide armed school security guards at each school within the LEA.(3)The contract described in Subsection (2)(b) shall include a detailed description of:(a)the rights of a student under state and federal law with regard to:(i)searches;(ii)questioning;(iii)arrests; and(iv)information privacy;(b)job assignment and duties of an armed school security guard, including:(i)the school to which an armed school security guard will be assigned;(ii)the hours an armed school security guard is present at the school;(iii)the point of contact at the school that an armed school security guard will contact in case of an emergency;(iv)specific responsibilities for providing and receiving information;(v)types of records to be kept, and by whom; and(vi)training requirements; and(c)other expectations of the contract security company in relation to school security at the LEA.(4)(a)In addition to the requirements for licensure under Title 58, Chapter 63, Security Personnel Licensing Act, an armed private security officer may only serve as an armed school security guard under a contract described in Subsection (2)(b) if the armed private security officer:(i)has a valid concealed carry permit issued under Title 53, Chapter 5a, Part 3, Concealed Firearm Permits;(ii)has undergone training from a county security chief or local law enforcement agency regarding:(A)the safe loading, unloading, storage, and carrying of firearms in a school setting;(B)the role of armed security guards in a school setting; and(C)coordination with law enforcement and school officials during an active threat;(iii)completes an initial "fit to carry" assessment the Department of Health and Human Services approves and a provider administers; and(iv)maintains compliance with mental health screening requirements consistent with law enforcement standards.(b)An armed school security guard that meets the requirements of Subsection (4)(a) shall, in order to remain eligible to be assigned as an armed school security guard at any school under a contract described in Subsection (2)(b), participate in and satisfy the training requirements of the initial, annual, and biannual trainings as defined in Section 53-22-105.(5)An armed school security guard may conceal or openly carry a firearm at the school at which the armed school security guard is employed under the contract described in Subsection (2)(b).(6)An LEA that enters a contract under this section shall inform the state security chief and the relevant county security chief of the contract and provide the contact information of the contract security company employing the armed security guard for use during an emergency.(7)The state security chief shall:(a)for each LEA that contracts with a contract security company under this section, track each contract security company providing armed school security guards by name and the contact information for use in case of an emergency; and(b)make the information described in Subsection (7)(a) readily available to each law enforcement agency in the state by school.(8)An armed school security guard shall file a report described in Subsection (9) if, during the performance of the armed school security guard's duties, the armed school security guard:(a)points a firearm at an individual; or(b)aims a conductive energy device at an individual and displays the electrical current.(9)(a)A report described in Subsection (8) shall include:(i)a description of the incident;(ii)the identification of the individuals involved in the incident; and(iii)any other information required by the state security chief.(b)An armed school security guard shall submit a report required under Subsection (8) to the school administrator, school safety and security director, and the state security chief within 48 hours after the incident.(c)The school administrator, school safety and security director, and the state security chief shall consult and review the report submitted under Subsection (9)(b).(10)If an armed school security guard uses deadly force, the armed school security guard:(a)shall be placed on administrative leave pending investigation;(b)may not be required to provide a written report described in Subsections (8) and (9);(c)(i)may not be required to participate in a voluntary interview; and(ii)if the armed school security guard chooses to participate in an interview, the interview may not be sooner than two sleep cycles after the incident; and(d)(i)shall be subject to investigation by the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction over the school's location; and(ii)if the involved party is a special function officer employed by a law enforcement agency, shall follow the same protocol established for officer-involved shootings under Section 76-2-408.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 53G-8-802 is amended to read:8. State Safety and Support Program -- Security Infrastructure53G-8-802Effective 05/06/26. State Safety and Support Program -- State board duties -- LEA duties.(1)There is created the School Safety Center.(2)The School Safety Center shall:(a)develop in conjunction with the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health and the state security chief model student safety and support policies for an LEA, including:(i)requiring an evidence-based behavior threat assessment that includes recommended interventions with an individual whose behavior poses a threat to school safety;(ii)procedures for referrals to law enforcement; and(iii)procedures for referrals to a community services entity, a family support organization, or a health care provider for evaluation or treatment;(b)provide training in consultation with the state security chief:(i)in school safety;(ii)in evidence-based approaches to improve school climate and address and correct bullying behavior;(iii)in evidence-based approaches in identifying an individual who may pose a threat to the school community;(iv)in evidence-based approaches in identifying an individual who may be showing signs or symptoms of mental illness;(v)on permitted disclosures of student data to law enforcement and other support services under the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g;(vi)on permitted collection of student data under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232h and Sections 53E-9-203 and 53E-9-305; and(vii)for administrators on rights and prohibited acts under:(A)Chapter 9, Part 6, Bullying and Hazing;(B)Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d et seq.;(C)Title IX of Education Amendments of 1972, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.;(D)Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.; and(E)the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.;(c)conduct and disseminate evidence-based research on school safety concerns;(d)disseminate information on effective school safety initiatives;(e)encourage partnerships between public and private sectors to promote school safety;(f)provide technical assistance to an LEA in the development and implementation of school safety initiatives;(g)in conjunction with the state security chief, make available to an LEA the model critical incident response training program a school and law enforcement agency shall use during a threat;(h)provide space for the public safety liaison described in Section 53-1-106 and the school-based mental health specialist described in Section 26B-5-102;(i)collaborate with the state security chief to determine appropriate application of school safety requirements in Utah Code to an online school;(j)create a model school climate survey that may be used by an LEA to assess stakeholder perception of a school environment; (k)in accordance with Section 53G-5-202, establish a charter school liaison including defined responsibilities for charter school communication and coordination with the School Safety Center; and(l)assist a foundation described in Section 53-22-108 in distributing school safety products if a foundation seeks assistance;(m)establishes defined roles for a multidisciplinary team and school safety personnel described in Chapter 8, Part 7, School Safety Personnel;(n)assist LEAs in implementing and maintaining universal access key box requirements under Section 53G-8-805;(o)in consultation with the state security chief, select a system to track relevant data, including the tracking required in Sections 53-22-105, 53G-8-701.5, 53G-8-701.8, and 53G-8-704; and(p)collect aggregate data and school climate survey results from an LEA that administers the model school climate survey described in Subsection (2)(j).(3)Nothing in this section requires:(a)an individual to respond to a school climate survey; or(b)an LEA to use the model school climate survey or any specified questions in the model school climate survey described in Subsection (2)(j).(4)The state board shall require an LEA to:(a)(i)if an LEA administers a school climate survey, review school climate data for each school within the LEA; and(ii)based on the review described in Subsection (4)(a)(i):(A)revise practices, policies, and training to eliminate harassment and discrimination in each school within the LEA;(B)adopt a plan for harassment- and discrimination-free learning; and(C)host outreach events or assemblies to inform students and parents of the plan adopted under Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(B);(b)no later than September 1 of each school year, send a notice to each student, parent, and LEA staff member stating the LEA's commitment to maintaining a school climate that is free of harassment and discrimination; and(c)report to the state board annually on the LEA's implementation of the plan under Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(B) and progress.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 53G-8-805 is amended to read:53G-8-805Effective 05/06/26. Panic alert device -- Security cameras -- Key box.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Universal access key box" means a UL Standard 1037 compliant secure container designed to store and protect emergency access keys and devices.(b)"Emergency responder" means law enforcement, fire service, or emergency medical personnel authorized by local authorities to respond to school emergencies.(2)In accordance with the results of the school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5, an LEA shall provide the lead teacher in each classroomfollowing with a wearable panic alert device that shall communicate directly with public safety answering points.:(a)the lead teacher in each classroom; and(b)beginning July 1, 2027, the appropriate school safety personnel described in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(2).(3)An LEA shall ensure, before the school year begins, all school building personnel receive training on the protocol and appropriate use of the panic alert device described in Subsection (2).(4)An LEA shall:(a)ensure all security cameras within a school building are accessible by: (i)a local law enforcement agency; and(ii)public safety answering points;(b)coordinate with a local law enforcement agency to establish appropriate access protocols; and(c)physically mark all hallways and doorways consistent with the incident response method or system the state security chief creates.(5)A school building shall include universal access key boxes that:(a)are installed at main entry points;(b)contain master keys and access devices providing complete access to all areas of the school;(c)are accessible only to authorized emergency responders;(d)are electronically monitored for tampering; and(e)are weather-resistant and vandal-resistant.(6)An LEA shall:(a)maintain universal access key boxes by:(i)conducting quarterly inspections;(ii)updating contents within 24 hours of any lock or access control changes;(iii)maintaining current key and access device inventories;(iv)documenting all inspections and updates; and(v)immediately replacing any damaged or malfunctioning boxes;(b)coordinate with local emergency responders to:(i)determine optimal box placement;(ii)establish access protocols;(iii)maintain current emergency contact information; and(iv)conduct annual reviews of box usage and effectiveness; and(c)include universal access key box locations and protocols in:(i)school emergency response plans;(ii)building schematic diagrams provided to emergency responders; and(iii)school safety and security training materials.(7)The state board shall:(a)establish standards for:(i)box installation and placement;(ii)access control and monitoring;(iii)maintenance schedules; and(iv)compliance verification;(b)in direct coordination with the state security chief, ensure new construction or major remodeling of a school building shall include the installation of automated external defibrillators in appropriate locations as the state board determines; and(c)provide technical assistance to LEAs implementing this section.(8)Nothing in this section:(a)affects requirements for fire department key boxes under applicable building or fire codes; or(b)restricts additional security measures implemented by LEAs that exceed these requirements.(9)This section is not subject to the restrictions in Section 41-6a-2003.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 53G-8-806 is enacted to read:53G-8-806Effective 05/06/26. School visitor management protocols -- Requirements -- LEA responsibilities.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Controlled access point" means a designated entry point to a school building that:(i)school personnel or electronic surveillance monitors during school hours; and(ii)requires visitors to follow check-in procedures before accessing the school building interior.(b)"School hours" means the period during which students are present in the school building for instructional purposes.(c)"Visitor" means any individual who is not a current student or employee of the school, including:(i)parents;(ii)contractors and service providers;(iii)volunteers; and(iv)guests.(d)"Visitor management system" means a process or technology an LEA uses to track, monitor, and manage visitors entering school facilities.(2)An LEA that establishes visitor management protocols shall ensure the protocols include:(a)designated controlled access points that require all visitors to:(i)enter the school building through a main entrance or other designated entry point during school hours;(ii)report immediately to a central office or reception area before accessing other areas of the school building; and(iii)present valid government-issued identification or other acceptable identification the LEA determines in LEA policy;(b)a visitor sign-in and sign-out process that records at minimum:(i)the visitor's name;(ii)the date and time of entry and exit;(iii)the purpose of the visit; and(iv)the specific location or individual the visitor intends to visit;(c)procedures for:(i)issuing visible identification, including a visitor badge or pass, that visitors must display prominently while on school grounds; and(ii)distinguishing between different types of visitors, such as parents, volunteers, contractors, and other guests;(d)protocols for monitoring and supervising visitors while on school grounds, including:(i)requiring school personnel to accompany visitors when visitors access areas where students are present, except as LEA policy otherwise provides for parents or authorized volunteers;(ii)prohibiting visitor access to restricted areas; and(iii)procedures school personnel shall follow to challenge or question any individual without visible identification;(e)procedures for responding to visitors who:(i)refuse to comply with visitor management protocols;(ii)pose a potential threat to school safety; or(iii)the LEA denies entry to the school;(f)clear signage at all school building entrances that:(i)directs visitors to the designated controlled access point;(ii)notifies visitors of the requirement to check in and obtain authorization before entering; and(iii)states that the LEA prohibits unauthorized entry and that unauthorized entry may result in criminal prosecution under Section 76-6-206; and(g)annual training for school personnel on:(i)implementing and enforcing visitor management protocols;(ii)identifying and responding to unauthorized individuals on school grounds; and(iii)communication procedures with the school safety and security specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6 or school safety and security director described in Section 53G-8-701.8.(3)(a)An LEA may implement an electronic visitor management system that includes capabilities such as:(i)automated identification verification;(ii)integration with sex offender registry databases;(iii)digital badge printing;(iv)automated visitor tracking and reporting; and(v)emergency notification capabilities.(b)If an LEA implements an electronic visitor management system, the LEA shall ensure that:(i)the LEA maintains visitor data in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;(ii)the LEA protects personally identifiable information and uses such information solely for school safety purposes; and(iii)the LEA notifies visitors of data collection practices in accordance with applicable privacy laws.(4)(a)An LEA may establish reasonable exceptions to the visitor management requirements described in Subsection (2) for:(i)emergency situations requiring immediate access to the school building;(ii)law enforcement officers, firefighters, or emergency medical personnel responding to an emergency;(iii)volunteers or employees of an educational foundation who have successfully completed a background check and ongoing monitoring as required in Section 53G-11-402;(iv)brief visits to exterior areas of the school campus that do not require entry into school buildings;(v)school-sponsored events held during regular school hours with larger than normal numbers of visitors on the school campus;(vi)school-sponsored public events held outside of regular school hours.(b)An LEA shall provide reasonable accommodations in visitor management procedures for individuals with disabilities in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.(5) If applicable, the school safety needs assessment an LEA conducts under Subsection 53G-8-701.5(1) shall include an evaluation of:(a)the adequacy of current visitor management protocols;(b)physical infrastructure supporting controlled access, including entry vestibules, secure reception areas, and electronic access control systems; and(c)recommendations for improvements to visitor management protocols and infrastructure.(6)(a)An LEA that implements visitor management protocols shall include information about the protocols in the school safety needs assessment conducted under Section 53G-8-701.5.(b)The state security chief may:(i)evaluate visitor management protocols as part of the school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5;(ii)collect and maintain data on visitor management protocol implementation and effectiveness; and(iii)develop recommended best practices for LEAs that choose to implement visitor management protocols.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 53G-8-901 is enacted to read:9. LEA Cybersecurity Standards53G-8-901Effective 05/06/26. General provisions -- Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Cyber Center" means the Utah Cyber Center created in Section 63A-16-1102.(2)"Data breach" means the same as that term is defined in Section 63A-16-1101.(3)"UETN" means the Utah Education and Telehealth Network created in Section 53H-4-213.4.

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 53G-8-902 is enacted to read:53G-8-902Effective 05/06/26. LEA compliance with cybersecurity standards -- Coordination.(1)An LEA shall comply with the minimum cybersecurity standards established by the Cybersecurity Commission created in Section 63C-27-201 in rule made in accordance with Subsection 63C-27-202(9).(2)An LEA shall comply with the minimum cybersecurity standards according to the phased implementation timeline established in rule under Subsection 63C-27-202(9).(3)UETN, in consultation with the Cyber Center and the state board, shall:(a)develop implementation guidelines and technical resources to assist LEAs in  meeting the minimum cybersecurity standards;(b)provide technical assistance and support to LEAs; and(c)coordinate the provision of cybersecurity services and resources to LEAs.(4)(a)The Cyber Center, the state board, and UETN shall coordinate services to LEAs to:(i)avoid duplication of efforts;(ii)maximize the effectiveness of cybersecurity resources;(iii)ensure LEAs receive consistent guidance and support; and(iv)facilitate information sharing regarding cybersecurity threats and best practices.(b)The coordination required under Subsection (4)(a) shall include:(i)regular meetings among the entities to discuss LEA cybersecurity needs and initiatives;(ii)joint development of training materials and resources;(iii)coordinated response to cybersecurity incidents affecting LEAs; and(iv)alignment of cybersecurity standards and network infrastructure requirements.

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 53G-8-903 is enacted to read:53G-8-903Effective 05/06/26. Data breach reporting -- Coordination with Utah Cyber Center.(1)An LEA shall report a data breach to the Cyber Center:(a)in accordance with Section 63A-19-405; and(b)consistent with standards and procedures established in rule under Subsection 63C-27-202(9).(2)In addition to the requirements in Section 63A-19-405, an LEA shall:(a)notify the state board within 24 hours of discovering the data breach;(b)coordinate with UETN if the data breach involves network infrastructure or services provided by UETN; and(c)cooperate with the Cyber Center's investigation and response efforts.(3)The Cyber Center shall provide assistance to an LEA in responding to a data breach in the same manner the Cyber Center provides assistance to a governmental entity as described in Title 63A, Chapter 16, Part 11, Utah Cyber Center.(4)An LEA shall:(a)participate in cybersecurity information sharing initiatives coordinated by the Cyber Center;(b)designate a primary point of contact for cybersecurity matters who shall interface with the Cyber Center, the state board, and UETN; and(c)cooperate with statewide cybersecurity assessments and improvement initiatives.(5)(a)A regional education service agency, as that term is defined in Section 53G-4-410, may serve as the designated primary cybersecurity contact for multiple LEAs within the service area.(b)If a regional education service agency serves as the primary contact under Subsection (5)(a), the agency shall:(i)coordinate with the Cyber Center, the state board, and UETN on behalf of the participating LEAs;(ii)ensure each participating LEA meets the minimum cybersecurity standards established under Subsection 63C-27-202(9); and(iii)maintain documentation of cybersecurity services provided to each LEA.

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 63C-27-201 is amended to read:63C-27-201Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/32. Cybersecurity Commission created.(1)There is created the Cybersecurity Commission.(2)The commission shall be composed of 24the following members:(a)one member the governor designates to serve as the governor's designee;(b)the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety;(c)the lieutenant governor, or an election officer, as that term is defined in Section 20A-1-102, the lieutenant governor designates to serve as the lieutenant governor's designee;(d)the chief information officer of the Division of Technology Services;(e)the chief information security officer, as described in Section 63A-16-210;(f)the chairman of the Public Service Commission shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(g)the executive director of the Utah Department of Transportation shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(h)the director of the Division of Finance shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(i)the executive director of the Department of Health and Human Services shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(j)the director of the Division of Indian Affairs shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(k)the Utah League of Cities and Towns shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(l)the Utah Association of Counties shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(m)the attorney general, or the attorney general's designee;(n)the commissioner of financial institutions, or the commissioner's designee;(o)the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(p)the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources shall designate a representative with professional experience in information technology or cybersecurity;(q)two local education agency employees tasked with job duties that include systems and security management from one charter school and one school district whom the state superintendent selects;(q)(r)the highest ranking information technology official, or the official's designee, from each of:(i)the Judicial Council;(ii)the Utah Board of Higher Education;(iii)the State Board of Education; and(iv)the State Tax Commission;(r)(s)the governor shall appoint:(i)one representative from the Utah National Guard; and(ii)one representative from the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity;(s)(t)the president of the Senate shall appoint one member of the Senate; and(t)(u)the speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member of the House of Representatives.(3)(a)The governor's designee shall serve as cochair of the commission.(b)The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall serve as cochair of the commission.(4)(a)The members described in Subsection (2) shall represent urban, rural, and suburban population areas.(b)No fewer than half of the members described in Subsection (2) shall have professional experience in cybersecurity or in information technology.(5)In addition to the membership described in Subsection (2), the commission shall seek information and advice from state and private entities with expertise in critical infrastructure.(6)As necessary to improve information and protect potential vulnerabilities, the commission shall seek information and advice from federal entities including:(a)the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency;(b)the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;(c)the Federal Bureau of Investigation; and(d)the United States Department of Transportation.(7)(a)Except as provided in Subsections (7)(b) and (c), a member is appointed for a term of four years.(b)A member shall serve until the member's successor is appointed and qualified.(c)Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (7)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that approximately half of the commission members appointed under Subsection (2)(r)(2)(s) are appointed every two years.(8)(a)If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the commission, the member shall be replaced in the same manner in which the original appointment was made.(b)An individual may be appointed to more than one term.(c)When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.(9)(a)A majority of the members of the commission is a quorum.(b)The action of a majority of a quorum constitutes an action of the commission.(10)The commission shall meet at least two times a year.

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 63C-27-202 is amended to read:63C-27-202Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/32. Commission duties.The commission shall:(1)identify and inform the governor of:(a)cyber threats and vulnerabilities towards Utah's critical infrastructure;(b)cybersecurity assets and resources; and(c)an analysis of:(i)current cyber incident response capabilities;(ii)potential cyber threats; and(iii)areas of significant concern with respect to:(A)vulnerability to cyber attack; or(B)seriousness of consequences in the event of a cyber attack;(2)provide resources with respect to cyber attacks in both the public and private sector, including:(a)best practices;(b)education; and(c)mitigation;(3)promote cyber security awareness;(4)share information;(5)promote best practices to prevent and mitigate cyber attacks;(6)enhance cyber capabilities and response for all Utahns;(7)provide consistent outreach and collaboration with private and public sector organizations; and(8)share cyber threat intelligence to operators and overseers of Utah's critical infrastructure.; and(9)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules establishing minimum cybersecurity standards for a local education agency, as that term is defined in Section 53G-3-402, that:(a)align with industry recognized cybersecurity frameworks and standards, including frameworks developed by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, the Center for Internet Security, or a successor organization;(b)take into account varying local education agency resources, capacity, and needs;(c)establish phased implementation timelines based on local education agency size, existing cybersecurity infrastructure, and available resources; and(d)as appropriate based on the local education agency's size, risk profile, and available resources, shall address:(i)identity and access management;(ii)asset management and inventory of hardware, software, and data systems;(iii)data protection;(iv)security monitoring and logging capabilities;(v)vulnerability management, including regular security assessments and patching procedures;(vi)incident response and recovery planning;(vii)security awareness training requirements for staff and administrators;(viii)third-party risk management for vendors with access to local education agency systems or data;(ix)network security controls;(x)backup and disaster recovery procedures; and(xi)governance structures for cybersecurity oversight within a local education agency.

Section 23:
Section 23.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.

Section 24:
Section 24.  Coordinating H.B. 44 with S.B. 69If H.B. 44, School Security Personnel Standards, and S.B. 69, School Device Revisions, both pass and become law, the Legislature intends that, on July 1, 2026, Subsection 53G-7-227(2) enacted in S.B. 69, be amended to read:"(2) Except as provided in Subsection (3), a student may not use a cellphone, smart watch, AI glasses, or emerging technology at a school during school hours.".